DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for2UZ -FE)

DI-55

DIAUP-01

DTC P075 1 Shift Solenoid ’A” Performance
(Shift Solenoid ValveS 1)
DTC P0756 | Shift Solenoid ’B” Performance

(Shift Solenoid Valve S2)

SYSTEM DESCRIPTION

The Engine and ECT ECU uses signals from the vehicle speed sensor and direct clutch speed sensor to

detectthe actual gearrange (

1st,2nd, 3rd, 4th or 5th gear). Thenthe Engineand ECT ECU comparesthe

actual gear with the shift schedule in the Engine and ECT ECU memory to detect mechanical troubles of
the shift solenoid valves, valve body or automatic transmission (clutch, brake or gear etc.).

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

P0751

P0756

The gear required buy the En.gineand ECT ECUUdoesnot.,
matchtheactualgearwhendriving (2  -tripdetectionlogic)

« Shiftsolenoidvalve S 1 isstuck openorclosed
Valve body is blocked up or stuck
¢ Automatic transmission (clutch, brake orgearetc.)

« Shift solenoid valve S2is stuck open or closed
«Valve body is blocked up or stuck
» Automatic transmission (clutch, brake orgearetc.)
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check shift solenoid valve S1 or S2 operation.

Shift solenoid S1:

D11991
D11992

D13058

OK
~_—

PREPARATION:
(@) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
() Remove the shift solenoid valve S1 or S2.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
minal and the battery negative lead to the solenoid body
ground.
OK:
Solenoid sounds operation noise.

AT-8).

NG> Replace shift solenoid valve S1 or S2 (See page

2 [ Check valve body (See page DI-26).

@

AT-8).

NG> Repair or replace valve body (See page

Repair or replace transmission
(See page AT-31).
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